Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 28 Clerks, Stenographic Reporters, Interpreters and Examiners [Repealed]

28.010.
Oath of clerks and deputies. [Repealed.]

28.020.
Bond of clerks. [Repealed.]

28.030.
Office, how and where kept. [Repealed.]

28.035.
Clerk to prepare bonds. [Repealed.]

28.036.
Clerk to refuse insufficient surety. [Repealed.]

28.040.
Oaths, clerks may administer. [Repealed.]

28.045.
Clerk may administer oaths, take affidavits and make orders of survey. [Repealed.]

28.050.
Each day’s proceedings in certain courts to be drawn up, read and signed. [Repealed.]

28.060.
Steps taken in case to be noted and filed. [Repealed.]

28.070.
General index of cases to be kept. [Repealed.]

28.080.
Executions, record concerning. [Repealed.]

28.090.
Record of executions, returns and receipts for redemption of land. [Repealed.]

28.100.
Judgment books. [Repealed.]

28.110.
Witnesses’ fees, clerks to ascertain. [Repealed.]

28.120.
Taxation of costs. [Repealed.]

28.130.
Record books to comply with state standards. [Repealed.]

28.135.
Procurement of record books and other materials — Payment. [Repealed.]

28.140.
Records, removal of from county. [Repealed.]

28.150.
Number of actions and indictments to be reported. [Repealed.]

28.160.
Franklin circuit clerk to keep separate docket books and files for commonwealth cases — Fees. [Repealed.]

28.165.
Purchase of supplies and equipment for handling of fiscal cases in Franklin Circuit Court. [Repealed.]

28.170.
Collection of fines and forfeitures. [Repealed.]

28.180.
Jurors to be paid by circuit clerk — Compensation of clerk. [Repealed.]

28.190.
Liability for advancements — Reports. [Repealed.]

28.200.
Settlements with fiduciaries, recording of — Clerk’s fees. [Repealed.]

28.210.
Settlements in circuit court recorded in county court, when — Clerk’s fees. [Repealed.]

28.220.
Indexer, appointment, term, qualifications and removal of. [Repealed.]

28.230.
Indexer, oath and bond of. [Repealed.]

28.240.
Indexer, duties of. [Repealed.]

28.250.
Indexer, salary of — Assistants. [Repealed.]

28.260.
Desk-room for indexer — Removal of records. [Repealed.]

28.270.
Record books, judges may order transcribed. [Repealed.]

28.280.
Preservation of court records. [Repealed.]

28.290.
Transcribed records entitled to credit of original. [Repealed.]

28.300.
Deputy clerks in counties containing a population of 75,000 or more. [Repealed.]

28.310.
Deputy county clerks in certain counties containing a city of the second class; salary of clerk. [Repealed.]

28.320.
Attorney general to institute proceedings for forfeiture of office. [Repealed.]

28.410.
Appointment of stenographic reporters. [Repealed.]

28.420.
Oath — Appointment to be recorded. [Repealed.]

28.430.
Report of proceedings — Transcript. [Repealed.]

28.435.
Use of recording device for recording testimony — Purchase — Definition. [Repealed.]

28.440.
Compensation of reporters in counties having a population of 150,000 or more. [Repealed.]

28.450.
Compensation of circuit court reporters in counties containing a city of the second class. [Repealed.]

28.460.
Fees of reporters in other courts. [Repealed.]

28.470.
Transcript or duplicate may be used on appeal. [Repealed.]

28.480.
Special reporter. [Repealed.]

28.490.
Removal of reporter. [Repealed.]

28.500.
Power to take depositions, administer oaths, and coerce witnesses. [Repealed.]

28.510.
Stenographic reporter in certain cities. [Repealed.]

28.610.
Interpreters for certain courts — Appointment — Term — Salary. [Repealed.]

28.620.
Qualifications of interpreters. [Repealed.]

28.630.
Oath of interpreter. [Repealed.]

28.640.
Duties of interpreter. [Repealed.]

28.650.
Interpreter for police court in cities of first class. [Repealed.]

28.652.
Person who is deaf, mute or both entitled to interpreter. [Repealed.]

28.654.
When interpreter shall be appointed. [Repealed.]

28.656.
Qualifications of interpreter. [Repealed.]

28.658.
Compensation for interpreters. [Repealed.]

28.660.
Examiners, appointment, oath, tenure. [Repealed.]

28.665.
Examiner’s office. [Repealed.]

28.670.
Examiners may administer oaths. [Repealed.]

28.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]